Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1268
Commission; rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the State Boat Act. In adopting such rules and regulations, the commission shall be governed by the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 68;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 123.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.